Utah statutes.
70C-3-102.   Balloon payment.
If any scheduled payment of a closed-end consumer credit debt is more than
twice as large as the average of all earlier scheduled payments, the debtor
has the right to refinance the amount of that payment at the time it is due if
the creditor is still offering that type of credit and the debtor is credit
worthy.  Credit terms may be no less favorable than those offered to the
general public by the creditor for the same type of credit at the time a
request for refinancing is accepted.
